Donald Trump|Speech: Donald Trump in Manchester, NH|June 30, 2016

I didn't even know Mike endorsed me, but I didn't even know Mike endorsed me, but I didn't even know Mike endorsed me, but I'll take it. We have a lot of - I'll take it. We have a lot of - I'll take it. We have a lot of endorsements. I'll tell you that the endorsements, I'll tell you that the endorsements, I'll tell you that the voters are our biggest endorsement.
We voters are our biggest endorsement. We voters are our biggest endorsement. We have a lot of endorsers. So thank you. Have a lot of endorsers. So thank you have a lot of endorsers, so thank you, Mike, and we'll get things moving and Mike and we'll get things moving and Mike and we'll get things moving and we'll get them changed.
So this is the - we'll get them changed. So this is the - we'll get them changed. So this is the Sylvania where it closed its plant, they Sylvania where it closed its plant, they Sylvania where it closed its plant, they closed the plant, 139 workers went to closed, the plant 139 workers went to closed, the plant 139 workers went to Mexico.
They also went to China, that was Mexico. They also went to China, that was Mexico. They also went to China that was in 2014. And here's what you have right in 2014 and here's what you have right in 2014 and here's what you have right now. You have Rockwell, some of the people, now you have Rockwell, some of the people, now you have Rockwell, some of the people that moved out of just this area in New that moved out of just this area in New that moved out of just this area in New Hampshire, you have Rockwell Automation Hampshire, you have Rockwell Automation Hampshire, you have Rockwell Automation Inc.
It close its plant, 170 workers moved Inc. It close its plant, 170 workers moved Inc. It close its plant 170 workers moved in this case all to Mexico. That was in, in this case all to Mexico that was in, in this case all to Mexico that was in 2009. Ethan Allen interiors closed its 2009. Ethan Allen interiors closed its 2009 Ethan Allen interiors closed its plant, laid off 260 people.
The workers plant laid off 260 people, the workers plant laid off 260 people, the workers all moved to Mexico and it wasn't so all moved to Mexico and it wasn't so all moved to Mexico and it wasn't so much the workers. The workers stayed here much. The workers, the workers stayed here much, the workers, the workers stayed here for the most part people from Mexico for the most part people from Mexico for the most part people from Mexico took their jobs, took their jobs, took their jobs, Freudenberg not closed, its plant and Freudenberg not closed its plant and Freudenberg not closed its plant and laid off 120 workers.
They moved their laid off 120 workers. They moved their laid off 120 workers. They moved their jobs to Mexico in 2008. Risdon Am's jobs to Mexico in 2008 Risdon Am's jobs to Mexico. In 2008, Risdon Am's closed its plant, laid off 40 workers and closed its plant, laid off 40 workers and closed its plant, laid off 40 workers and moved their jobs to Mexico.
Regional job moved their jobs to Mexico, regional job moved their jobs to Mexico. Regional job losses have been fantastically poor, losses have been fantastically poor, losses have been fantastically poor, fantastically bad and disgraceful New fantastically, bad and disgraceful New fantastically bad and disgraceful New Hampshire's lost 31 percent of their Hampshire's lost 31 percent of their Hampshire's lost 31 percent of Their manufacturing job since NAFTA just think manufacturing job since NAFTA just think manufacturing job since NAFTA. Just think of that 36 percent since China entered of that 36 percent since China entered of that 36 percent since China entered the World Trade Organization.
That's a - the World Trade Organization, that's a - the World Trade Organization, that's a lot of jobs, that's a big chunk, almost lot of jobs, that's a big chunk, almost lot of jobs, that's a big chunk, almost 50 % of your manufacturing, Pennsylvania, 50 % of your manufacturing, Pennsylvania, 50 % of your manufacturing, Pennsylvania is lost, 36 percent of their is lost, 36 percent of their is lost, 36 percent of their manufacturing jobs since NAFTA and 34 manufacturing jobs since NAFTA and 34 manufacturing jobs since NAFTA and 34 percent since China entered the WTO. Ohio percent since China entered the WTO, Ohio percent since China entered the WTO, Ohio and remember Bill Clinton signed NAFTA and remember Bill Clinton signed NAFTA and remember Bill Clinton signed NAFTA. Just for those of you that have any - just for those of you that have any - just for those of you that have any questions, Bill Clinton signature, right questions, Bill Clinton signature, right questions, Bill Clinton signature, right on the bottom, Ohio lost 34 percent of - on the Bottom Ohio lost 34 percent of on the bottom, Ohio lost 34 percent of the manufacturing jobs since NAFTA, 32 the manufacturing jobs since NAFTA, 32. The manufacturing jobs since NAFTA 32 percent since China entered the WTO percent since China entered the WTO percent since China entered the WTO, another Clinton, another Clinton, another Clinton mein lost 39 percent of their mein lost 39 percent of their mein lost 39 percent of their manufacturing Job since NAFTA 39 percent manufacturing job since NAFTA, 39 percent manufacturing job since NAFTA 39 percent and 34 percent since China entered the and 34 percent since China entered the and 34 percent since China entered the WTO. So you know it's just - it's not very WTO. So you know, it's just - it's not very WTO. So you know it's just - it's not very hard to explain.
It's not very hard to, hard to explain. It's not very hard to, hard to explain. It's not very hard to understand what is difficult is to understand what is difficult is to understand what is difficult is to figure out why people did this, why you figure out why people did this, why you figure out why people did this, why you know we Have expansion plans in this know we have expansion plans in this know we have expansion plans in this country.
We have all sorts of plans, but country we have all sorts of plans, but country we have all sorts of plans, but there's no expansion. We have job losses, there's no expansion. We have job losses, there's no expansion. We have job losses and other countries have massive and other countries have massive and other countries have massive expansion.
We have 500 billion dollar expansion. We have 500 billion dollar expansion. We have 500 billion dollar trade deficit with China, massive trade trade deficit with China, massive trade trade deficit with China, massive trade deficits with Japan take a look at the deficits with Japan. Take a look at the deficits with Japan.
Take a look at the imbalance in trade between Japan and the imbalance in trade between Japan and the imbalance in trade between Japan and the United States. They send us millions of United States. They send us millions of United States. They send us millions of cars. We send them beef and you ought to cars, we send them beef and you ought to cars, we send them beef and you ought to take a look at a chart sometime and just take a look at a chart sometime and just take a look at a Chart sometime and just take a look at the difference between - take a look at the difference between - take a look at the difference between what we send them and what they send us, what we send them and what they send us, what we send them and what They send us Mexico and I respect Mexico, I respect Mexico and I respect Mexico.
I respect Mexico and I respect Mexico. I respect their leaders. What they've done to us is their leaders. What they've done to us is their leaders. What they've done to us is incredible. Their leaders are so much incredible. Their leaders are so much incredible. Their leaders are so much smarter, so much sharper and it's smarter so much sharper and it's smarter so much sharper and it's incredible.
In fact, that could be a incredible - in fact, that could be a incredible - in fact, that could be a Mexican plane up there. They're getting Mexican plane up there. They're getting Mexican plane up there. They're getting ready to attack. So that's the way it is ready to attack. So that's the way it is ready to attack.
So that's the way it is folks. I just want to say that this is a folks, I just want to say that this is a folks, I just want to say that this is a factory and the legacy really of Hillary factory and the legacy really of Hillary factory and the legacy really of Hillary Clinton and Bill Clinton, because this Clinton and Bill Clinton, because this Clinton and Bill Clinton, because this legacy is largely due and you could legacy is largely due and you could - legacy is largely due and you could actually say entirely due to NAFTA. The actually say entirely due to NAFTA, the actually say entirely due to NAFTA, the plant closed its doors and shipped its plant, closed its doors and shipped its plant, closed its doors and shipped its jobs to Mexico.
China. They did commercial jobs to Mexico, China. They did commercial jobs to Mexico, China, they did commercial lighting. There were very big companies, lighting, there were very big companies, lighting, there were very big companies to do business with them. The real to do business with them, the real to do business with them.
The real Clinton Global Initiative is their Clinton Global Initiative is their Clinton Global Initiative is their economic plan to ship America's jobs economic plan to ship America's jobs economic plan to ship America's jobs overseas. That's what's happening, whether overseas, that's what's happening, whether overseas, that's what's happening.
Whether we like it, whether we don't like it, it's - we like it, whether we don't like it, it's - we like it, whether we don't like it, it's what's happening and everybody knows it, what's happening and everybody knows it, what's happening and everybody knows it. So you're looking here really at a plant, so you're looking here really at a plant.
So you're looking here really at a plant and the wreckage of NAFTA and the - and the wreckage of NAFTA and the - and the wreckage of NAFTA and the wreckage of China's entrance into the wreckage of China's entrance into the wreckage of China's entrance into the World Trade Organization America's lost World Trade Organization, America's lost World Trade Organization, America's lost nearly 1/3 of its manufacturing jobs, nearly 1/3 of its manufacturing jobs, nearly 1/3 of its manufacturing jobs since 1997 since 1997 since 1997. This is America we're talking about.
This is America we're talking about. This is America we're talking about since 1997, driven by these two Hillary since 1997, driven by these two Hillary since 1997 driven by these two Hillary Clinton understood and backed and Bill Clinton, understood and backed and Bill Clinton understood and backed and Bill Clinton.
Certainly as the president's Clinton, certainly as the president's Clinton, certainly as the president's initiatives, they are a disaster and now initiatives, they are a disaster and now initiatives, they are a disaster and now they want to go into TPP trans-pacific, they want to go into TPP trans-pacific.
They want to go into TPP trans-pacific partnership that will make NAFTA in my partnership that will make NAFTA in my partnership that will make NAFTA in my opinion, look like a baby trans-pacific opinion, look like a baby trans-pacific opinion, look like a baby trans-pacific partnership. It's over 5,000 pages, long partnership.
It's over 5,000 pages, long partnership. It's over 5,000 pages long. Every country that's in that partnership, every country that's in that partnership. Every country that's in that partnership has studied every word, every comma, every has studied every word, every comma, every has studied every word, every comma, every sentence, every paragraph, our guys sentence, every paragraph, our guys sentence, every paragraph, our guys probably haven't even read it.
This is probably - haven't even read it. This is probably haven't even read it. This is the way we do business. All you have to - the way we do business, all you have to - the way we do business, all you have to do is look at Obamacare, look at what do is look at Obamacare, look at what do is look at Obamacare, look at what passed, where Congress, The senators passed where Congress - the senators passed, where Congress the senators practically, nobody even read it, and now practically, nobody even read it.
And now practically, nobody even read it. And now do we have a mess with Obamacare? So the - do we have a mess with Obamacare? So the - do we have a mess with Obamacare, so the same thing is going on with TPP. Just same thing is going on with TPP. Just same thing is going on with TPP, just like Hillary Clinton pushed through the like Hillary Clinton pushed through the like Hillary Clinton pushed through the trade deal with South Korea that killed trade deal with South Korea that killed trade deal with South Korea that killed another 100,000 jobs and she pushed it another 100,000 jobs and she pushed it another 100,000 jobs and she pushed it through.
Look at what passed, where Congress the look at what passed, where Congress the look at what passed, where Congress, the Senate is practically nobody even read Senate is practically nobody even read Senate is practically nobody even read it and now do we have a mess with it. And now do we have a mess with it and now do we have a mess with Obamacare?
So the same thing is going on Obamacare. So the same thing is going on Obamacare. So the same thing is going on with TPP, just like Hillary Clinton with TPP. Just like Hillary Clinton with TPP, just like Hillary Clinton pushed through the trade deal with South, pushed through the trade deal with South, pushed through the trade deal with South Korea that killed another 100,000 jobs, Korea that killed another 100,000 jobs, Korea that killed another 100,000 jobs.
And she pushed it through after pledging and she pushed it through after pledging and she pushed it through after pledging she wouldn't. And she did pledge. She was - she wouldn't. And she did pledge. She was - she wouldn't. And she did pledge. She was not going to do that, but it happened, so not going to do that, but it happened.
So not going to do that, but it happened. So South Korea, not a big beneficiary and we - South Korea not a big beneficiary and we - South Korea not a big beneficiary and we protect them. We have 28,000 soldiers protect them. We have 28,000 soldiers protect them. We have 28,000 soldiers right now on the line between north and right now on the line between north and right now on the line between north and south.
And what happens, what happens if south and what happens, what happens if south and what happens? What happens if there's a war we get involved in the - there's a war we get involved in the - there's a war we get involved. In the meantime, they're killing the son trade. Meantime, they're killing the son trade.
Meantime, they're killing the son trade, nothing against South Korea. I do a lot, nothing against South Korea. I do a lot nothing against South Korea. I do a lot of business with South Korea, how of business with South Korea, how of business with South Korea, how buildings over there. But honestly we buildings over there.
But honestly we buildings over there, but honestly we have to get smart folks. We can't have to get smart folks. We can't have to get smart folks. We can't continue to do this. They are an economic continue to do this. They are an economic continue to do this. They are an economic behemoth. We protect them, they don't behemoth, we protect them, they don't behemoth, we protect them.
They don't reimburse us for what it's costing and reimburse us for what it's costing and reimburse us for what it's costing and we're going to sue no. Twenty one. We're going to sue no. Twenty one. We're going to sue no twenty one trillion dollars as a country and our trillion dollars as a country and our trillion dollars as a country and our infrastructure is a mess and many of our infrastructure is a mess and many of our infrastructure is a mess and Many of our plants and factories are just like this, plants and factories are just like this.
Plants and factories are just like this, that's standing to the side of me, New that's standing to the side of me, New that's standing to the side of me. New Hampshire has lost 37 % of its Hampshire has lost, 37 % of its Hampshire has lost 37 % of its manufacturing jobs since China joined manufacturing jobs since China joined manufacturing jobs.
Since China joined the World Trade Organization and this the World Trade Organization and this the World Trade Organization and this was a deal that was very, very much was a deal that was very, very much was a deal that was very, very much pushed by Hillary Clinton. Today, our pushed by Hillary Clinton today, our pushed by Hillary Clinton.
Today our manufacturing trade deficit with the manufacturing trade deficit with the manufacturing trade deficit with the world is nearly 800 billion dollars. So world is nearly 800 billion dollars. So world is nearly 800 billion dollars. So we have a trade deficit, we trade, we have - we have a trade deficit, we trade, we have - we have a trade deficit.
We trade, we have a deficit of eight hundred billion, a deficit of eight hundred billion, a deficit of eight hundred billion dollars. Nothing new, in fact, it's amazing dollars, nothing new. In fact, it's amazing dollars, nothing new. In fact, it's amazing that for years we've had massive that for years we've had massive that for years we've had massive deficits.
Now it's getting higher, it's deficits now it's getting higher. It's deficits now, it's getting higher, it's getting worse. These countries are getting worse. These countries are getting worse. These countries are treating us like we're children because treating us like we're children because treating us like we're children because we have leaders that don't know what's - we have leaders that don't know what's - we have leaders that don't know what's going on.
The trade deficit was only going on, the trade deficit was only going on. The trade deficit was only eighty four billion when Bill Clinton eighty four billion when Bill Clinton eighty four billion when Bill Clinton was first inaugurated. So we've taken it was first inaugurated. So we've taken - it was first inaugurated, so we've taken it from 84 billion, which is a lot of money from 84 billion, which is a lot of money from 84 billion, which is a lot of money to now eight hundred billion dollars and to now eight hundred Billion dollars and to now eight hundred billion dollars and going up going up fast unless I become going up going up fast unless I become going up going up fast.
Unless I become president, you will see a drop like president, you will see a drop like president. You will see a drop like you've never seen. You've never seen - you've never seen - you feel you'll never see goofy and you feel you'll never see goofy and you feel you'll never see goofy. And don't forget when our factories closed, don't forget when our factories closed, don't forget when our factories closed, the nearby businesses suffer and you see the nearby businesses suffer and you see the nearby businesses suffer.
And you see that in this here. You see that in every - that in this, here you see that in every - that in this here you see that in every year a look at New York State year, a look at New York State year, a look at New York State. I wonder, York stayed in a massive - I wonder York stayed in a massive. I wonder York stayed in a massive landslide and I went around and toured landslide.
And I went around and toured landslide. And I went around and toured it. I'm from there. But I had no idea when it - I'm from there, but I had no idea when it - I'm from there. But I had no idea when you go upstate, when you go out to parts, you go upstate. When you go out to parts, you go upstate. When you go out to parts of Long Island Suffolk, Suffolk County of Long Island, Suffolk, Suffolk County of Long Island, Suffolk, Suffolk County, it's incredible.
When you take a look at, it's incredible when you take a look at, it's incredible. When you take a look at the devastation, when you take a look at the devastation, when you take a look at the devastation, when you take a look at the devastation that took place in New - the devastation that took place in New - the devastation that took place In New York and Pennsylvania and Connecticut, York and Pennsylvania and Connecticut, York and Pennsylvania and Connecticut, Connecticut's a great state.
I love Connecticut's a great state. I love Connecticut's a great state. I love Connecticut devastation caused mostly by Connecticut devastation caused mostly by Connecticut devastation caused mostly by NAFTA because mostly by companies moving NAFTA because mostly by companies moving NAFTA because mostly by companies moving out of Connecticut and New York and out of Connecticut and New York.
And out of Connecticut and New York and Pennsylvania and Maryland by the way and Pennsylvania and Maryland by the way and Pennsylvania and Maryland by the way and Rhode Island, Rhode Island, Rhode Island, I had these all at one time and Delaware, I had these all at One time and Delaware, I had these all at one time and Delaware and we won every single county of every and we won every single county of every and we won every single county of every single state.
Massive victories because I single state massive victories because I single state massive victories because I understand the problem and it's about understand the problem and it's about understand the problem and it's about jobs, it's about protection, it's about jobs, it's about protection, it's about jobs, it's about Protection, it's about stopping Isis.
It's about a lot of things stopping Isis. It's about a lot of things stopping Isis. It's about a lot of things, but it's also heavily about jobs and - but it's also heavily about jobs and - but it's also heavily about jobs and we're going to change it and we're going - we're going to change it and we're going - we're going to change it and We're going to get it changed fast that I can tell to get it changed fast that I can tell to get it changed fast that I can tell you and I can promise you that when you - you and I can promise you that when you you and I can promise you that when you have large numbers of unemployed have large numbers of unemployed have large numbers of unemployed blue-collar workers, incomes go down, blue-collar workers, incomes go down, blue-collar workers, incomes go down across the country just across the - across the country just across the - Across the country, just across the entire country, entire country, entire country and it affects so many other businesses and it affects so many other businesses and it affects so many other businesses when a plant like this closes, it just when a plant like this closes it just When a plant like this closes, it just affects so much and so many other people affects so much and so many other people affects so much and so many other people, so many other lives and so many other so many other lives and so many other.
So many other lives and so many other businesses when you force workers in businesses, when you force workers in businesses, when you force workers in America to compete with workers earning America to compete with workers earning America to compete with workers earning $ 1 a day overseas. Our whole standard of $ 1 a day overseas, our whole standard of $ 1 a day overseas, our whole standard of living goes down.
We have workers for 18, living goes down, we have workers for 18, living goes down, we have workers for 18 years. They haven't received an increase years. They haven't received an increase years. They haven't received an increase. Their real wages are lower now than they - their real wages are lower now than they - their real wages are lower now than they were 18 years ago.
They're working longer were 18 years ago, they're working longer were 18 years ago. They're working longer hours. They're working harder. They have hours, they're working harder. They have hours, they're working harder. They have jobs that they don't like as much and jobs that they don't like as much and jobs that they don't like as much and they make it less money and there are - they make it less money and there are - they make it less money and there Are people in the audience don't raise your people in the audience, don't raise your people in the audience, don't raise your hand.
I don't want to embarrass you but hand - I don't want to embarrass you but hand I don't want to embarrass you. But there are people in the audience that there are people in the audience that there are people in the audience that are exactly in that position. And you are exactly in that position and you are exactly in that position.
And you know a lot of people say, well, they make know a lot of people say, well, they make know a lot of people say well, they make the goods cheaper well by the time they the goods cheaper well by the time they the goods cheaper well By the time they manufacture them and send, manufacture them and send, manufacture them and send the transportation is very expensive and the transportation is very expensive and the transportation is very expensive and all of these other things, we're better all of these other things.
We're better all of these other things. We're better paying a little bit more and having jobs paying a little bit more and having jobs paying a little bit more and having jobs so much better system the way it used to so much better system the way it used to so much better system. The way it used to be be be we manufacture goods and we then sell, we manufacture goods and we then sell, we manufacture goods and we then sell those goods to other countries.
But we those goods to other countries, but we those goods to other countries. But we sell them to other countries and a lot sell them to other countries and a lot sell them to other countries. And a lot of people say, oh, well, the goods will be of people say, oh, well, the goods will be of people say, oh, well, the goods will be cheaper.
They'll come in, they'll be cheaper. They'll come in, they'll be cheaper. They'll come in, they'll be cheaper. Yeah, but we lost all our jobs, so cheaper, yeah, but we lost all our jobs. So cheaper, yeah, but we lost all our jobs. So a better offer than not quite as cheap a better offer than not quite as cheap, a better offer than not quite as cheap.
And the goods will also be of a higher and the goods will also be of a higher. And the goods will also be of a higher quality because we do a higher quality quality because we do a higher quality quality because we do a higher quality good and we're known for that. But all of good and we're known for that.
But all of good and we're known for that, but all of a sudden the jobs are gone and frankly a sudden the jobs are gone and frankly a sudden the jobs are gone and frankly the goods can come in cheaply, the people, the goods can come in Cheaply the people the goods can come in cheaply, the people don't have any money to buy him, so don't have any money to buy him.
So don't have any money to buy him. So that's a problem, is that right? So we - that's a problem is that right? So we - that's a problem is that right. So we became the richest economy in the world, became the richest economy in the world, became the richest economy in the world with the biggest middle class in the - with the biggest middle class in the - with the biggest middle class in the world.
By becoming the biggest producer world by becoming the biggest producer world by becoming the biggest producer, the biggest producer in the world, the - the biggest producer in the world, the the biggest producer in the world, the wealth this created was shared all wealth. This created was shared all wealth.
This created was shared all across our nation then came the era of across our nation then came the era of across our nation then came the era of surging trade deficits. Everyone wanted surging trade deficits. Everyone wanted surging trade deficits. Everyone wanted to go out and let's go and our to go out and let's go and our to go out and let's go and our government made it possible so easy.
We government made it possible so easy. We government made it possible so easy. We start sending our factories to various start sending our factories to various start sending our factories to various countries and Mexico is done. Countries and Mexico is done. Countries and Mexico is done unbelievably well.
Mexico is unbelievable, unbelievably well. Mexico is unbelievable, unbelievably well. Mexico is unbelievable. It's a mini version of what's going on. It's a mini version of what's going on. It's a mini version of what's going on in China. You look at Ford, you look at - so in China you look at Ford, you look at - so in China you look at Ford, you look at so many different companies, you look many different companies, you look many different companies, you look recently, I could name ten companies.
Just recently I could name ten companies just recently I could name ten companies just right off the bat. You look at carrier right off the bat, you look at carrier right off the bat, you look at carrier Air Conditioning, they closed right Air Conditioning, they closed right Air Conditioning. They closed right before my primary in Indiana.
They might before my primary in Indiana. They might before my primary in Indiana, they might have been responsible for the victory, have been responsible for the victory, have been responsible for the victory other than Bobby Knight. It was probably other than Bobby Knight, it was probably other than Bobby Knight.
It was probably more responsible than anybody, but - but we more responsible than anybody, but - but we more responsible than anybody. But - but we had a big victory in Indiana. Carriers had a big victory in Indiana. Carriers had a big victory in Indiana, carriers leaving Indiana going to Mexico, fired, leaving Indiana going to Mexico, fired, leaving Indiana going to Mexico, fired all that people.
So our middle class is all that people. So our middle class is all that people. So our middle class is shrunk ten percentage points since 1970, shrunk ten percentage points since 1970, shrunk ten percentage points since 1970 and chair of GDP controlled by workers and chair of GDP controlled by workers and chair of GDP controlled by workers has steadily declined and shifted To has steadily declined and shifted to - has steadily declined and shifted to corporations and the corporations are corporations and the corporations are corporations and the corporations are your special interest people.
They're your special interest people. They're your special interest people. They're your people with a lot of clout, they're your people with a lot of clout. They're your people with a lot of clout. They're the people that give campaign the people that give campaign the people that give campaign contributions to Hillary Clinton.
These contributions to Hillary Clinton. These contributions to Hillary Clinton, these are the people, folks look, you're living, are the people, folks look, you're living, are the people folks look, you're living in a rigged system. I used to say it in a rigged system. I used to say it in a rigged system.
I used to say it about the primary because I'd win a about the primary because I'd win a about the primary because I'd win a state and I didn't get the state and I didn't get the state and I didn't get the - I mean, I'd win a State by a lot and the - I mean, I'd win a state by a lot. And the - I mean, I'd win a state by a lot and the delegates would go to somebody else, say, delegates would go to somebody else, say, delegates would go to somebody else, say, wait a minute, wait a minute, wait a minute.
I just won the state of Louisiana, how I just won the state of Louisiana, how I just won the state of Louisiana, how come the delegates are in mine? Well, it come - the delegates are in mine, well it come - the delegates are in mine. Well, it goes this way and that way, no, you don't goes this way and that way.
No, you don't goes this way. And that way, no, you don't understand, understand, understand. And I think I brought out a lot of the - and I think I brought out a lot of the - and I think I brought out a lot of the flaws because I - you know, people maybe flaws because I - you know, people maybe flaws because I - you know, People maybe they live with us for years, but I'd win, they live with us for years, but I'd win, they live with us for years.
But I'd win states and all of a sudden I find out states and all of a sudden I find out states and all of a sudden I find out where are my delegates. And if I didn't, where are my delegates? And if I didn't, where are my delegates? And if I didn't win by massive numbers, because the win by massive numbers, because the win by massive numbers, because the system's wrecked look at Bernie Sanders system's wrecked.
Look at Bernie Sanders system's wrecked. Look at Bernie Sanders. Look, what happened to him with the look, what happened to him with the look what happened to him with the super-delegates, you know, the Republican super-delegates, you know the Republican super-delegates, you know the Republican system is just as bad, but it's more system is just as bad.
But it's more system is just as bad, but it's more sophisticated because they don't use sophisticated because they don't use sophisticated because they don't use super-delegates. Super-delegates are too super-delegates, super-delegates are too super-delegates, super-delegates are too obvious. But Bernie Sanders with the obvious, but Bernie Sanders with the obvious, but Bernie Sanders with the super-delegates, I mean that whole deal super-delegates, I mean that whole deal super-delegates, I mean, that whole deal was also rigged.
And I think we're gonna was also rigged. And I think we're gonna was also rigged and I think we're gonna get a lot of the - Bernie Sanders voters get a lot of the Bernie Sanders voters, get a lot of the Bernie Sanders voters because one thing we had in common is because one Thing we had in common is because one thing we had in common is not a lot, but he knew that trade deals, not a lot, but he knew that trade deals, not a lot, but he knew that trade deals were terrible.
And I know the trade deals were terrible and I know the trade deals were terrible and I know the trade deals are terrible. The difference is I can fix are terrible. The difference is I can fix are terrible. The difference is I can fix the trade deals and make them phenomenal the trade deals and make them phenomenal the trade deals and make them phenomenal.
You know, a couple of the people who the, you know, a couple of the people who the, you know a couple of the people who the Republican Party said, oh, gee! Trump is Republican Party said, oh, gee! Trump is Republican Party said, oh, gee! Trump is going against trade, I'm not against going against trade, I'm not against going against trade.
I'm not against trade. I just want to make better deals. I trade, I just want to make better deals. I trade, I just want to make better deals. I think it's great, I think having trade is think it's great. I think having trade is think it's great. I think having trade is great. I want to make better deal and - and great I want to make better deal and - and great I want to make better deal.
And - and I'm always so amazed, I'm always. So I'm always so amazed, I'm always. So I'm always so amazed. I'm always so amazed when I see somebody talking about amazed when I see somebody talking about amazed when I see somebody talking about, you know my viewpoints, my viewpoints are, you know my viewpoints.
My viewpoints are, you know my viewpoints. My viewpoints are very simple. I want great deals for this very simple. I want great deals for this very simple. I want great deals for this country. Somebody said, are you a free country? Somebody said, are you a free country? Somebody said are you a free trader?
The answer is yes. But to have trader the answer is yes, but to have trader the answer is yes. But to have free trade, you have to have smart people, free trade, you have to have smart people, free trade, you have to have smart people. We don't have smart people representing. We don't have smart people representing - we don't have smart people representing us or we have people that are controlled us or we have people that are controlled us or we have people that are controlled by the lobbyists and controlled by the - by the lobbyists and controlled by The - by the lobbyists and controlled by the special interests.
But yes, I'm a free special interests, but yes, I'm a free special interests. But yes, I'm a free trader, but they say, well, how do you trader, but they say, well, how do you trader, but they say, well, how do you define your stance on training, one of define your stance on training, one of define your stance on training, one Of the reporters asked me this question a.
The reporters asked me this question a - the reporters asked me this question a few months ago and I said here's my few months ago and I said here's my few months ago and I said here's my stance on trading. I want to make great stance on trading. I want to make great stance on trading. I want to make great deals for the United States, call it fair deals for the United States, call it fair deals for the United States, call it fair trade, call it free trade, call it this trade, call it free trade, call it this trade, call it free Trade call it this ten different names, we can give it I ten different names, we can give it I ten different names we can give it.
I want to make great deals for the people want to make great deals for the people want to make great deals for the people of the United States. I want to bring our of the United States, I want to bring our of the United States. I want to bring our jobs back. I don't want companies leaving jobs back. I don't want companies leaving jobs back.
I don't want companies leaving because we don't know what we're doing because we don't know what we're doing because we don't know what we're doing. And if companies leave and fire as in and if companies leave and fire as in and if companies leave and fire as in the case of carrier and so many others, the case of carrier and so many others, the case of carrier and so many others, there's Going to be consequences, there's going to be consequences, there's going to be consequences.
They're not going to make their air. They're not going to make their air. They're not going to make their air conditioners in Mexico, send them into conditioners in Mexico, send them into conditioners. In Mexico, send them into the United States, the United States, the United States, 1,400 people that are phenomenal people, 1,400 people that are phenomenal people, 1,400 people that are phenomenal people that help build that firm, send them into that help build that firm, send them into that Help build that firm, send them into the United States and there's no - the United States and there's no the United States and there's no consequence no.
Now there's a consequence, consequence no. Now there's a consequence, consequence no. Now there's a consequence. The consequence is they're going to pay - the consequence is they're going to pay. The consequence is they're going to pay a 35 percent tax when that air a 35 percent tax when that air a 35 percent tax.
When that air conditioner comes into the country and conditioner comes into the country and conditioner comes into the country and here's what's going to happen one of two, here's what's going to happen. One of two, here's what's going to happen. One of two things, things, things, either they're not going to move, which either they're not going to move, which either they're not going to move, which is mostly going to happen or if it's too is mostly going to happen or if it's too is mostly going to Happen or if it's too late or they move because you want to late or they move because you want to late or they move because you want to look at their bottom line, their bottom look at their bottom line, their bottom look at their bottom line, their Bottom lines, much different, okay, and we're lines much different, okay?
And we're lines much different, okay? And we're gonna have a strong border. When I got ta gonna have a strong border, when I got ta gonna have a strong border, when I got ta have a weak border, they're gonna have to have a weak border. They're gonna have to have a weak border. They're gonna have to go through a strong strong border but go through a strong strong border but go through a strong, strong border.
But here's the difference. We're either gonna, here's the difference. We're either gonna, here's the difference. We're either gonna keep them here or we're gonna make a - keep them here or we're gonna make a - keep them here or we're gonna make a hell of a lot of money. It's very simple hell of a lot of money.
It's very simple. Hell of a lot of money, it's very simple and they're gonna regret that they ever and they're gonna regret that they ever and they're gonna regret that they ever moved and we're going to keep everybody moved and we're going to keep everybody moved and We're going to keep everybody here.
They're not going to leave and I've here, they're not going to leave and I've here, they're not going to leave. And I've watched over the years, I've watched the watched over the years. I've watched the watched over the years, I've watched the government, our government, they don't government our government, they don't government our government, they don't have a clue.
They want to give - have a clue. They want to give - have a clue. They want to give interest-free loans. They want to give interest-free loans, they want to give interest-free loans, they want to give all sorts of deals they want. They don't all sorts of deals they want. They don't all sorts of deals they want.
They don't have a clue. A couple of cases I read have a clue. A couple of cases I read have a clue. A couple of cases I read about where they took the money and they about where they took the money and they about where they took the money and they left anyway left anyway left anyway. So they got cheap money and then they - so they got cheap money and then they - so they got cheap money and then they left because they didn't have good left because they didn't have good left because they didn't have good lawyers who didn't say like you have To lawyers who didn't say like you have to lawyers who didn't say like you have to stay, we're giving your money stay so stay we're giving your money stay so stay we're giving your money stay.
So it's very simple. They want to go to. It's very simple. They want to go to - it's very simple, they want to go to another country to pay tax, to get their another country to pay tax, to get their another country to pay tax, to get their product back into. They could go the rest product back into - they could go the rest product back into they could go the rest of the world, they could do whatever they of the world they could do whatever they of the world they could do whatever they want and don't kid Yourself folks other want and don't kid yourself folks other want and don't kid yourself folks, other countries do that with us.
We have a free countries do that with us. We have a free countries do that with us. We have a free deal with China. They can put their stuff deal with China, they can put their stuff deal with China, they can put their stuff in no consequence, no tax, no, nothing in no consequence, no tax, no, nothing in no consequence, no tax, no, nothing try doing business with China.
I have a try doing business with China, I have a try doing business with China. I have a couple of friends here that are very couple of friends here that are very couple of friends here that are very much involved with New Hampshire. They much involved with New Hampshire, they much involved with New Hampshire, they love New Hampshire.
They can't get their love New Hampshire. They can't get their love New Hampshire. They can't get their product into China. And if they do get it product into China and if they do get it product into China and if they do get it into have to pay a massive tax, so you into have to pay a massive tax so you into have to pay a massive tax.
So you have to have a fair thing going on and have to have a fair thing going on and have to have a fair thing going on. And we don't have anything fair. There's - we don't have anything fair. There's - we don't have anything fair. There's nothing fair. The real medium, the real - nothing fair, the real medium, the real - nothing fair.
The real medium, the real median earnings of male workers in median earnings of male workers in median earnings of male workers in America has decreased by almost a America has decreased by almost a America has decreased by almost a thousand dollars from 1973. To here I thousand dollars from 1973 to here I thousand dollars from 1973 to here.
I mean think of it, it's hard to believe mean think of it. It's hard to believe mean think of it. It's hard to believe and the real median earnings of female and the real median earnings of female and the real median earnings of female workers in America has decreased by 1154. Workers in America has decreased by 1154 workers in America has decreased by 1154 dollars from 2007. To 2014, that's a short dollars from 2007 to 2014, that's a short dollars from 2007 to 2014. That's a short period of time.
Median household incomes, period of time, median household incomes, period of time, median household incomes are now more than four are now more than four are now more than four thousand dollars less than they were in thousand dollars less than they were in thousand dollars less than they Were in 2000 before we opened our markets to 2000 before we opened our markets to 2000 before we opened our markets to China.
Hey, I give China a lot of credit. I China, hey, I give China a lot of credit. I China, hey, I give China a lot of credit. I have great relationships. I mean the have great relationships. I mean the have great relationships. I mean the largest bank in the world from China is largest bank in the world from China is largest bank in the world from China is a tenant of mine in one of my buildings, a tenant of mine in one of my buildings, a tenant of mine In one of my buildings, I do tremendous business with China, with I do tremendous business with China, with I do tremendous business with China, with condominiums.
I do business with Bank of condominiums. I do business with Bank of condominiums. I do business with Bank of America, which is one of the buildings I America, which is one of the buildings I America, which is one of the buildings I have in, in a partnership with another have in, in a partnership with another have in, in a partnership With another great company in San Francisco and 1290 great company in San Francisco and 1290 great company in San Francisco and 1290 Avenue of the America, one of the biggest Avenue of the America, one of the biggest Avenue of the America, one of the biggest office buildings In New York came office buildings in New York came office buildings in New York came directly and indirectly right through directly and indirectly right through directly and indirectly right through China.
From 1945 to 2001, our economy grew China from 1945 to 2001. Our economy grew China from 1945 to 2001. Our economy grew at an average rate of 3.5 %, okay, that's at an average rate of 3.5 %, okay, that's at an average rate of 3.5 %. Okay, that's not great. By the way, that's not great, if not great. By the way that's not great, if not great, by the way that's not great.
If China goes below 7 %, it's like you know China goes below 7 %. It's like you know China goes below 7 %. It's like you know world scandal. They go to 7 %, just like world scandal, they go to 7 %, just like world scandal, they go to 7 %. Just like our - we're bragging about 3.5 well now we - our - we're bragging about 3.5. Well, now we - our - we're bragging about 3.5. Well, now we have almost nothing after China joined, have almost nothing after China joined, have almost nothing after China joined the World Trade Organization, our growth, the World Trade Organization, our growth, the World Trade Organization, our growth rate has been cut in half and right now rate Has been cut in half and right now rate has been cut in half and right now our growth rate for the last quarter is our growth rate for the last quarter is our growth rate for the last quarter is down to practically zero down to practically zero Down to practically zero, it's practically zero those days are - it's practically zero those days are - it's practically zero.
Those days are over the share of men. Here's something that's the share of men. Here's something that's the share of men. Here's something that's just sad. Just sad. Just sad the share of men in their prime, working the share of men in their prime, working the share of men in their prime working years and not working.
And they're just years and not working. And they're just years and not working and they're just not working. Not working, not working so in their prime working is not working so in their prime working is not working. So in their prime working is not working, has nearly tripled since the late 1960s has nearly tripled since the late 1960s has nearly tripled since the late 1960s.
Think of that, I mean think of that as a think of that. I mean think of that as a think of that. I mean, think of that as a statement for our country, the trade statement for our country, the trade statement for our country, the trade policies of Hillary Clinton, global policies of Hillary Clinton, global policies of Hillary Clinton, global finance, ears.
And they're all controlling finance, ears. And they're all controlling finance, ears and they're all controlling her. They have a hundred percent. They her, they have a hundred percent. They her, they have a hundred percent. They might as well stay on Hillary Clinton on might as well stay on Hillary Clinton on might as well stay on Hillary Clinton on their forehead.
They have total control their forehead. They have total control their forehead, they have total control of her. That's why she's going to approve of her. That's why she's going to approve of her. That's why she's going to approve TPP. Just so you understand TPP, just so you understand TPP, just so you understand she totally approved, she wanted it.
So she totally approved, she wanted it, so she totally approved, she wanted it so badly. She said this is the gold badly. She said this is the gold badly. She said this is the gold standards of trading pacts. This is the standards of trading pacts. This is the standards of trading pacts. This is the gold standard.
It's all over television, gold standard. It's all over television, gold standard. It's all over television. It's all over and then all of a sudden it's all over and then all of a sudden it's all over. And then all of a sudden, she heard me make a speech saying what's she heard me make a speech saying what's she heard me make a speech saying what's wrong with TPP and she changed.
She said wrong with TPP and she changed, she said wrong with TPP and she changed, she said I no longer support it. So she went from I no longer support it. So she went from I no longer support it. So she went from the gold standard to - I don't support it the gold standard to - I don't support it the gold standard to - I don't support it because she didn't like what I was because she didn't like what I was because she didn't like what I was Saying so she went against it now, what saying so she went against it now, what saying so she went against it.
Now what happens is if she ever got in which happens is if she ever got in which happens is if she ever got in, which would be a sad sad day for our country would be a sad sad day for our country would be a sad sad Day for our country and our workers, especially they'll take and our workers, especially they'll take and our workers, especially they'll take a sentence.
That doesn't mean anything a sentence. That doesn't mean anything a sentence. That doesn't mean anything, make a little change, change a little, make a little change, change a little, make a little change, change a little comma here or there. And she'll say now I comma here or there and she'll say now I comma here or there.
And she'll say now I can finally support it. It's wonderful can finally support it. It's wonderful can finally support it. It's wonderful and that will be worse than NAFTA signed and that will be worse than NAFTA signed and that will be worse than NAFTA signed by her husband that would be worse than by her husband that would be worse than by her husband that would be worse Than NAFTA that will make NAFTA look like a NAFTA that will make NAFTA look like a NAFTA that will make NAFTA look like a toy, okay, toy, okay, toy, okay, look like a toy.
So just remember I said look like a toy. So just remember I said look like a toy, so just remember I said it, hopefully we don't have to experience it. Hopefully we don't have to experience it. Hopefully we don't have to experience that, but she will sign it assures you that. But she will sign. It assures you that, but she will sign, it assures you here and sign it 100 % here and sign it 100 % here and sign it 100 %. The greatest danger yet is the TPP. The greatest danger yet is the TPP. The greatest danger yet is the TPP, another Hillary Clinton trade deal and another Hillary Clinton trade deal and another Hillary Clinton trade deal.
And that's it. It's going to happen. You know, that's it. It's going to happen. You know, that's it. It's going to happen. You know one of the things with TPP, the single one of the things with TPP, the single one of the things with TPP, the single biggest weapon used against us and to biggest weapon used against us and to biggest weapon used against us and to destroy our Companies is devaluation of destroy, our companies is devaluation of destroy, our companies is devaluation of currencies and the greatest ever at that currencies and the greatest ever at that currencies.
And the greatest ever at that is China, very smart, is China, very smart, is China very smart. They're like grand chess masters, they - they're like grand chess masters. They - they're like grand chess masters, they are and we're like checker players but are - and we're like checker players but are - and we're like checker players but bad once they have done such a job on us.
Bad once they have done such a job on us bad once they have done such a job on us evaluation and NAFTA doesn't cover the evaluation and NAFTA doesn't cover the evaluation and NAFTA doesn't cover the subject. And I've said if you're going to subject and I've said if you're going to subject and I've said if you're going to approve this TPP and if you're going to approve this TPP and if you're going to approve this TPP and if you're going to approve any Trade you have to cover, approve any trade, you have to cover, approve any trade, you have to cover currency manipulation because there's currency manipulation because there's currency manipulation because there's such tremendous currency manipulation, such tremendous currency manipulation, such tremendous currency manipulation.
Now TPP, it's not mentioned, I won't tell now TPP, it's not mentioned, I won't tell. Now TPP, it's not mentioned. I won't tell you some of the people that went crazy, you - some of the people that went crazy, you some of the people that went crazy when they wanted to bring it in and put when they wanted to bring it in and put when they wanted to Bring it in and put it in because I went out and I actually it in because I went out and I actually it in because I went out and I actually did a radio ad for a group of people did a radio ad for a group of People did a radio ad for a group of people that love this country and they did an - that love this country and they did an - that love this country and they did an ad on currency manipulation.
How it's not ad on currency manipulation, how it's not ad. On currency manipulation, how it's not covered by TPP and if you would have covered by TPP and if you would have covered by TPP and if you would have seen the people that were opposed to seen the people that were opposed to seen the people that were Opposed to that, what do we have to lose by having that, what do we have to lose by having that?
What do we have to lose by having it? It's like why are people upset that it? It's like why are people upset that it? It's like why are people upset that with free trade that I'm - I like that I with free trade that I'm - I like that I with free trade that I'm - I like that I want to make better deals.
I said I want want to make better deals. I said I want want to make better deals. I said I want to make better deals with Mexico. I want to make better deals with Mexico. I want to make better deals with Mexico. I want to make better deals with China, does it to make better deals with China, does it to make better deals with China?
Does it all? Trump is messing with free trade? No. All Trump is messing with free trade. No, all Trump is messing with free trade. No, I'm messing with bad deals that we can - I'm messing with bad deals that we can - I'm messing with bad deals that we can make good. I can make good deals, make good. I can make good deals, make good.
I can make good deals. Why would somebody fight them? I mean the - why would somebody fight them? I mean the - why would somebody fight them? I mean the US Chamber fights, they said all Trump US Chamber fights. They said all Trump US Chamber fights. They said all Trump wants to stop for each other. I don't wants to stop for each other.
I don't wants to stop for each other. I don't want to sell free trade. I left free want to sell free trade. I left free want to sell free trade. I left free trade, but I want to make great deals. I trade, but I want to make great deals. I trade but I want to make great deals. I want to take a deal that's faulty.
Well want to take a deal that's faulty. Well, want to take a deal that's faulty. Well, we're losing hundreds and hundreds of - we're losing hundreds and hundreds of - we're losing hundreds and hundreds of billions of dollars a year. If I can make billions of dollars a year, if I can make billions of dollars a year, if I can make it good, isn't that a positive thing?
Okay, it good. Isn't that a positive thing? Okay, it good. Isn't that a positive thing? Okay. That's something Bernie can't do. He's - that's something Bernie can't do. He's - that's something Bernie can't do. He's right that they're bad, but he won't be right that they're bad. But he won't be right that they're bad, but he won't be able to fix them.
I'll be able to fix, able to fix them, I'll be able to fix, able to fix them, I'll be able to fix them and we can't fix them. There are them and we can't fix them. There are them and we can't fix them. There are consequences. Again, we don't trade and consequences. Again, we don't trade and consequences.
Again, we don't trade and you know how long that'll last for about, you know how long that'll last for about, you know how long that'll last for about 24 hours before they come to the table. 24 hours before they come to the table 24 hours before they come to the table. But you have to be able to walk every, but you have to be able to walk every.
But you have to be able to walk every time if you're gonna make a good deal time. If you're gonna make a good deal time. If you're gonna make a good deal, you have to be able to walk John. Kerry, you have to be able to walk John, Kerry, you have to be able to walk, John. Kerry never walked from the Iran deal.
It's one never walked from the Iran deal. It's one never walked from the Iran deal. It's one of the most embarrassing deals I've ever of the most embarrassing deals I've ever of the most embarrassing deals I've ever seen in my life to horrible deal, but seen in my life to horrible deal, but seen in my life to horrible deal.
But just as a deal, just as a deal, just as a deal, it's an embarrassment he never walked he - it's an embarrassment, he never walked he - it's an embarrassment he never walked. He lost every single point. They get one, lost every single point. They get one lost every single point, they get one hundred and fifty billion dollars back, hundred and fifty billion dollars back, hundred and fifty billion dollars back.
They get everything. We never got our - they get everything. We never got our - they get everything. We never got our hostages, we got him when the deal was hostages, we got him when the deal was hostages, we got him when the deal was going to be signed, we should have had going to be signed, we should have had going to be signed.
We should have had those hostages year before we should those hostages year before we should those hostages year before we should have never agreed to a negotiation. We have never agreed to a negotiation. We have never agreed to a negotiation. We should have said no way we should have - should have said no way we should have - should have said no way we should have left the room and we should have said left the room and we should have said left the room and we should have said Guess what we're doubling up your guess what we're doubling up your guess what we're doubling up your sanctions, they would have been back on sanctions, they would have been back on sanctions, they would have been back on the telephone.
Please come back please. The telephone, please come back please. The telephone, please come back. Please please please. We beg you come back and please please we beg you come back and please please we beg you come back and you know what's going to happen there. You know what's going to happen there, you know, what's going to happen there was was was the hostages would have been out years, the hostages would have been out years the hostages would have been out years ago.
So it's just - it's said and I just ago. So it's just - it's said and I just ago. So it's just - it's said and I just - you know I - I leave you with this because you know I - I leave you with this because you know I - I leave you with this because - and then we're gonna take some questions and then we're gonna take Some questions and then we're gonna take some questions, but we've had some pretty good people, but we've had some pretty good people.
But we've had some pretty good people representing us over the years. I'll tell representing us over the years, I'll tell representing us over the years. I'll tell you, we've had some very, very great you we've had some very, very great you. We've had some very, very great people. And let me tell you what they people.
And let me tell you what they people and let me tell you what they said about trade, because these are our said about trade because these are our said about trade because these are our finest ok and we also have a one other finest ok. And we also have a one other finest ok and we also have a one other thing I just want and I think I have to thing I just want and I think I have to thing I just want and I think I have to say this, we Have to immediately withdraw say this, we have to immediately withdraw say this.
We have to immediately withdraw from the trans-pacific partnership from the trans-pacific partnership from the trans-pacific partnership immediately. We cannot continue to go on immediately. We cannot continue to go on immediately. We cannot continue to go on. It's such a one-sided bad deal done by it's such a one-sided bad deal done by.
It's such a one-sided bad deal done by the special interests. We have to address the special interests we have to address the special interests we have to address. We have to withdraw ok. We have and we we have to withdraw ok. We have and we we have to withdraw ok. We have and we should seek a guarantee from Hillary should seek a guarantee from Hillary should seek a guarantee from Hillary Clinton that she won't sign it and we'll Clinton that she won't sign it and we'll Clinton that she won't sign it and we'll make great trade Deals with people, I make great trade deals with people.
I make great trade deals with people. I want to make great deals, want to make great deals, want to make great deals. I like one-on-one deals. I don't like I like one-on-one deals. I don't like - I like one-on-one deals, I don't like massive numbers of countries where massive numbers of countries where massive numbers of countries where nobody's reading except them.
But we want nobody's reading except them. But we want nobody's reading except them. But we want one-on-one with countries that treat us one-on-one with countries that treat us one-on-one with countries that treat us properly and we're going to treat them properly and we're going to treat them properly and we're going to treat them properly, appoint the toughest and properly appoint.
The toughest and properly appoint the toughest and smartest trade negotiators who will smartest trade negotiators who will smartest trade negotiators who will fight for the American worker that's fight for the American worker that's fight for the American worker. That's what we have to do. We have no choice.
We what we have to do, we have no choice. We what we have to do, we have no choice. We have to do it. Direct Commerce Secretary have to do it, direct Commerce Secretary have to do it, direct Commerce Secretary. I will do that to identify every - I will do that to identify every - I will do that to identify every violation of trade agreements, then violation of trade agreements, then violation of trade agreements, then direct all agencies to use every direct all agencies to use every direct.
All agencies to use every available tool to end the abuse these available tool to end the abuse these available tool to end the abuse. These are abuses. These aren't like, oh, gee! This are abuses. These aren't like, oh, gee! This are abuses. These aren't like, oh, gee! This is not quite working, these are abused is not quite working.
These are abused is not quite working. These are abused. They are abusing us, they are taking - they are abusing us, they are taking - they are abusing us. They are taking advantage of us because they think we advantage of us because they think we advantage of us because they think we are being led by very, very stupid.
People are being led by very, very stupid. People are being led by very, very stupid people. Believe me, these are abuses tell our - believe me, these are abuses, tell our - believe me, these are abuses, tell our NAFTA partners. We want to renegotiate NAFTA partners. We want to renegotiate NAFTA partners.
We want to renegotiate NAFTA, want to renegotiate, hey, we want a NAFTA want to renegotiate, hey, we want a NAFTA want to renegotiate, hey, we want a better deal, ok, better deal, ok, better deal. Ok. This includes dealing with the VAT on. This includes dealing with the VAT on. This includes dealing with the VAT on our goods Mexico instituted after we our goods Mexico instituted after we our goods Mexico instituted after we eliminated the tariff and improving, eliminated the tariff and improving - eliminated the tariff and improving worker protections.
In both countries, in worker protections in both countries, in worker protections in both countries, in both countries, if we don't get a better both countries, if we don't get a better both countries, if we don't get a better deal, we will withdraw under Article 2205 deal. We will withdraw under Article 2205 deal.
We will withdraw under Article 2205, very simple, very simple, very simple. We withdraw. I don't think we'll ever we withdraw. I don't think we'll ever we withdraw. I don't think we'll ever withdraw because if they ever thought we withdraw because if they ever thought we withdraw because if they ever thought we were going to withdraw, they'll give us - were going to withdraw.
They'll give us - were going to withdraw. They'll give us everything we want. As an example, we have everything we want. As an example, we have everything we want. As an example, we have a situation where some of the richest, a situation where some of the richest, a situation where some of the richest and biggest and most powerful countries and biggest and most powerful countries and biggest and most powerful countries in the world.
We protect. They only pay us in the world, we protect, they only pay us in the world. We protect, they only pay us a fraction of what it costs to protect a fraction of what it costs to protect a fraction of what it costs to protect them. I said they got ta pay up and we them, I said they got ta pay up and we them, I said they got ta pay up and we have to be prepared to with you.
I don't have to be prepared to with you. I don't have to be prepared to with you. I don't want to withdraw, but you have to always want to withdraw. But you have to always want to withdraw. But you have to always be prepared. You can't say, oh, gee, we're be prepared. You can't say, oh, gee, we're be prepared, you can't say, oh, gee, we're never going to withdraw because they're never going to withdraw because they're never going to withdraw because they're gonna say, well, we're never going to gonna say, well, we're never going to gon Na say, well, we're never going to negotiate.
So Hillary Clinton said we negotiate. So Hillary Clinton said we negotiate. So Hillary Clinton said we will stay with our allies. We will never will stay with our allies. We will never will stay with our allies. We will never leave our elet's, I think it sounds good, leave our elet's I think it sounds good, leave our elet's.
I think it sounds good, sounds wonderful except for one thing sounds wonderful except for one thing sounds wonderful except for one thing you can't make a deal because the Allies you can't make a deal because the Allies you can't make a deal because the Allies are now Going to say, well, listen to her are now going to say well listen to her are now going to say well listen to her.
We're never gonna leave now I'll tell we're never gonna leave now I'll tell we're never gonna leave. Now I'll tell you, there may be a point where we you - there may be a point where we you - there may be a point where we withdraw for two hours before we get a withdraw for two hours before we get a withdraw for two hours before we Get a phone call, okay, but you can't say we're phone call, okay, but you can't say we're phone call, okay.
But you can't say we're never ever ever gonna leave. We protect never ever, ever gonna leave. We protect never ever, ever gonna leave. We protect Japan, we protect Germany, we protect Japan, we protect Germany, we protect Japan, we protect Germany, we protect South Korea, we protect Saudi Arabia, South Korea, we protect Saudi Arabia, South Korea, we protect Saudi Arabia.
Saudi Arabia has so much money. It's Saudi Arabia has so much money. It's - Saudi Arabia has so much money. It's - there's never been anything like it. There's never been anything like it. There's never been anything like it. They wouldn't be there for a month if we - they wouldn't be there for a month.
If we - they wouldn't be there for a month, if we didn't protect them, they will do, didn't protect them, they will do, didn't protect them, they will do whatever we want, whatever we want, whatever we want and we want to be fair to them. We want and we want to be fair to them, we want and we want to be fair to them.
We want to be fair to everybody, but they have to, to be fair to everybody, but they have to, to be fair to everybody, but they have to pay. We have these massive deficits. We're pay, we have these massive deficits. We're pay, we have these massive deficits. We're like a debtor nation. I told you 21 like a debtor nation.
I told you 21 like a debtor nation. I told you 21 trillion dollars very soon and we're trillion dollars very soon and we're trillion dollars very soon. And we're protecting the world. This is in 30 and protecting the world. This is in 30 and. Protecting the world, this is in 30 and 40 and 50 years ago, folks, we're living 40 and 50 years ago, folks.
We're living 40 and 50 years ago folks we're living in a different time, instruct the in a different time, instruct the in a different time, instruct the Treasury secretary to label China, the Treasury secretary to label China, the Treasury secretary to label China, the currency manipulator, currency Manipulator, currency manipulator instruct US trade representatives to instruct US trade representatives to instruct US trade representatives to bring cases against China's unfair, bring cases against China's unfair bring cases against China's unfair subsidy behavior.
I mean they subsidize subsidy behavior. I mean they subsidize subsidy behavior. I mean, they subsidize all these people that go out. They come all these people that go out, they come all these people that go out, they come into our country and they kill our into our country and they kill our into our country and they kill our companies.
Look at what's happening with companies, look at what's happening with companies, look at what's happening with the steel, they're dumping product, all the steel, they're dumping product, all the steel, they're dumping product all over the place. They're dumping, they are over the place they're dumping, they are over the place they're dumping, they are dumping so much product.
Our steel dumping so much product, our steel dumping so much product, our steel companies are getting killed. I'm going companies are getting killed. I'm going companies are getting killed. I'm going to protect our steel workers. I know more to protect our steel workers. I know more to protect our steel workers.
I know more about steel workers than anybody that's about steel workers than anybody. That's about steel workers than anybody. That's ever run for office. These are great ever run for office. These are great ever run for office. These are great, great people. They are being killed just great people. They are being killed just great people.
They are being killed just like the workers Mike and the workers like the workers Mike and the workers like the workers Mike and the workers here are being just destroyed. They train here are being just destroyed. They train here are being just destroyed. They train their workers and then they lose their - their workers and then they lose their - their workers and then they lose their job.
Think of it. I mean how - how sad job think of it, I mean how - how sad job think of it. I mean how, how sad if China does not immediately stop, its if China does not immediately stop, its if China does not immediately stop its improper practices including theft of improper practices including theft of improper practices, including theft of trade secrets and intellectual property, trade secrets and Intellectual property, trade secrets and intellectual property that costs us millions and millions and that costs us millions and millions.
And that costs us millions and millions and millions of jobs and actually threatens millions of jobs and actually threatens millions of jobs and actually threatens the security of our country. I will use the security of our country. I will use the security of our country. I will use every lawful power to stop the cheating, every lawful power to stop the cheating, every lawful power to stop the cheating because that's what it is because that's what it is because that's what it is cheating including tariffs under Section cheating, including tariffs under Section Cheating including tariffs under Section 201 and 301 of the Trade Act of 1974 in 201 and 301 of the Trade Act of 1974 in 201 and 301 of the Trade Act of 1974 in Section 232 of the trade expansion Act Section 232 of the trade expansion Act Section 232 of the trade expansion Act of 1960 to trade expansion, huh?
Trade of 1960 to trade expansion, huh? Trade of 1960 to trade expansion, huh? Trade expansion for who? So I just wanted to go expansion for who. So I just wanted to go expansion for who. So I just wanted to go through a few of those points and you through a few of those points and you through a few of those points.
And you know there are so many things that we know there are so many things that we know there are. So many things that we could talk forever about trade, there's could talk forever about trade, there's could talk forever about trade. There's nothing that's closer to my heart than nothing that's closer to my heart than nothing that's closer to my heart than trade.
There's nothing that's closer to trade. There's nothing that's closer to trade. There's nothing that's closer to my heart actually than the workers that my heart actually than the workers that my heart actually than the workers that are being so badly hurt, so badly taken are being so badly hurt, so badly taken are being so badly hurt so badly.
Taken care of by what we're doing and it's care of by what we're doing and it's care of by what we're doing. And it's just not going to happen anymore when just not going to happen anymore when just not going to happen anymore. When you look back and you look at our great - you look back and you look at our great - you look back and you look at our great leaders, Abraham Lincoln said we have to leaders.
Abraham Lincoln said we have to leaders. Abraham Lincoln said we have to protect ourselves from goods pouring, protect ourselves from goods, pouring, protect ourselves from goods pouring into our country. We want to be a into our country. We want to be a into our country. We want to be a manufacturer. We want Goods pouring out manufacturer, we want Goods pouring out manufacturer, we want Goods pouring out of our country and we want to be paid of our country and we want to be paid of our country and we want to be paid for it.
George, Washington talked about it for it, George. Washington talked about it for it. George. Washington talked about it so many talked about it, the great ones. So many talked about it, the great ones. So many talked about it. The great ones talked about it. The ones we have today talked about it, the ones we have today talked about it, the ones we have today, they want to protect the rest of the - they want to protect the rest of the - they want to protect the rest of the world.
I think it's almost as though they world, I think it's almost as though they world. I think it's almost as though they want to protect the world and they don't want to protect the world and they don't want to protect the world and they don't care about our workers and Hillary care about our workers and Hillary care about our workers and Hillary Clinton honestly, is one of the great Clinton, honestly, is one of the great Clinton, honestly, is one of the great abusers.
She doesn't understand the abusers. She doesn't understand the abusers. She doesn't understand the workers. She said recently a few months workers. She said recently a few months workers. She said recently a few months ago that she wants to put the miners out ago that she wants to put the miners out ago that she wants to put the miners out of business.
Essentially. She said I want of business essentially, she said I want of business essentially. She said I want to put the miners, I'm going to put the - to put the miners, I'm going to put the - to put the miners. I'm going to put the miners out of business by the way, she miners out of business by the way, she miners out of business.
By the way, she didn't do too well in West Virginia. I didn't do too well in West Virginia. I didn't do too well in West Virginia. I don't imagine she's going to do too well. Don't imagine she's going to do too well. Don't imagine she's going to do too well. And if you look at Pennsylvania and if and if you look at Pennsylvania and if and if you look at Pennsylvania and if you look at some of the other places, you look at some of the other places, you look at some of the other places, Wyoming, Some of the other places, I can't - Wyoming, some of the other places, I can't, Wyoming, some of the other places, I can't a man who would vote for her.
She said I a man who would vote for her. She said I a man who would vote for her. She said I want to put the miners and the mines out, want to put the miners and the mines out, want to put the miners and the mines out of business who would vote for her. We of business who would vote for her we of business who would vote for her.
We want to put our people back to work, want to put our people back to work, want to put our people back to work. We're gonna put them back to work. We're gonna put them back to work. We're gonna put them back to work just just just we're putting our people back to work. We're putting our people back to work, we're putting our people back to work.
Thank you very much. Okay, how about a few? Thank you very much. Okay, how about a few? Thank you very much. Okay, how about a few questions from anybody? Yes, sir, go ahead. Questions from anybody. Yes, sir, go ahead. Questions from anybody. Yes, sir, go ahead. Yes, thank you. Thank you your comments.
Yes, thank you. Thank you your comments. Yes, thank you. Thank you. Your comments today on what's a very important issue today on what's a very important issue today on what's a very important issue to me as a manufacturing guy? Yes, good to me. As a manufacturing guy, yes, good to me. As a manufacturing guy, yes, good and you know cheap products are actually and you know cheap products are actually and you know cheap products are actually really very expensive and I believe really very expensive and I believe really very expensive and I believe people don't realize that You're right, I - people don't realize that you're right.
I - people don't realize that. You're right. I believe that there's a really simple believe that there's a really simple believe that there's a really simple answer. The best answers are the really answer the best answers are the really answer the best answers are the really simple answers. And you're a cultural simple answers and you're a cultural simple answers and you're a cultural leader.
Today. You aspire to be a leader today. You aspire to be a leader today, you aspire to be a political leader, but right now you're a political leader. But right now, you're a political leader. But right now, you're a cultural leader and you can use that cultural leader and you can use that cultural leader.
And you can use that position to create a cultural change and position to create a cultural change and position to create a cultural change. And its really simple take about an hour and its really simple take about an hour and its really simple take about an hour and it costs $ 0 and with that we can it costs $ 0 and with that we can it costs $ 0. And with that, we can restructure manufacturing in this restructure manufacturing in this restructure manufacturing in this country and bring back jobs and country and bring back jobs and country and bring back jobs and eliminate China as a source.
It's really eliminate China as a source. It's really eliminate China as a source. It's really dirty by the way. I don't want to dirty - by the way, I don't want to dirty by the way, I don't want to eliminate China. I want them to just eliminate China. I want them to just eliminate China. I want them to just treat us fairly forgot to eliminate John, treat us fairly forgot to eliminate John, treat us fairly forgot to eliminate John.
I want China to sell tremendous numbers. I want China to sell tremendous numbers. I want China to sell tremendous numbers of products and items to our countries of products and items to our countries of products and items to our countries. So 100 eliminated so and they can't. So 100 eliminated. So and they can't.
So 100 eliminated so - and they can't cheat us any longer. They're cheating. So cheat us any longer. They're cheating. So cheat us any longer. They're cheating. So when they - when they do their monetary, when they - when they do their monetary, when they - when they do their monetary manipulation, they manipulate they manipulation, they manipulate, they manipulation, they manipulate, they devalue.
When they do that devalue, when they do that devalue, when they do that, that's just killing us. Every time they - that's just killing us every time they - that's just killing us. Every time they do it, we lose jobs in this country, go do it. We lose jobs in this country, go do it. We lose jobs in this country, go ahead.
So - so I see that it's up to us the ahead. So. So I see that it's up to us the ahead. So - so I see that it's up to us. The people we - the people we get to decide people, we - the people we get to decide people, we - the people we get to decide what to buy and if we have a cultural what to buy and if we have a cultural what to buy.
And if we have a cultural preference for purchasing the preference for purchasing the preference for purchasing the american-made manufactured product, then american-made manufactured product, then american-made manufactured product, then what that will do is it will create - what that will do is it will create what that will Do is - it will create demand for American products, so you're demand for American products, so you're demand for American products.
So you're right. Let me just tell you it's a good right. Let me just tell you it's a good right. Let me just tell you it's a good point because in Japan and in China, they point because in Japan and in China, they point because in Japan and in China, they really want to buy products made in really want to buy products made in really want to Buy products made in Japan and in China whereas the United Japan and in China, whereas the United Japan and in China, whereas the United States we buy anything and our people, States, we buy anything.
And our people, States we buy anything and our people should have more pride in buying made in - should have more pride in buying, made in - should have more pride in buying made in the USA. Remember the old days we had the USA, remember the old days we had the USA, remember the old days we had made in America or made in the USA and made in America or made in the USA and made in America or made in the USA. And we should put that out.
I think I'm gonna, we should put that out. I think I'm gonna, we should put that out. I think I'm gonna do that. We should put that on a product do that. We should put that on a product. Do that we should put that on a product made in the US. So, so thank you very much. So you know so, so thank you very much.
So you know so, so thank you very much. So you know there are countries that don't want to - there are countries that don't want to - there are countries that don't want to buy. You know, when we do business as an buy, you know when we do business as an buy, you know when we do business as an example with Japan, many friends in Japan, example with Japan, many friends in Japan, example with Japan, many friends in Japan, they know It's true they know they send, they know it's true.
They know they send, they know it's true. They know they send the cars, we send the beef a lot of times the cars we send the beef a lot of times the cars we send the beef a lot of times they send it back. We send things to them, they send it back. We send things to them, they send it back, we send things to them, they send it back, can't get it, can't they send it back, can't get it, can't they send it back, can't get it, can't pass certain tests, okay?
And it's better pass certain tests, okay. And it's better pass certain tests, okay, and it's better product than what they have. They send it product than what they have. They send it product than what they have. They send it back. China sends things back. And I said back China sends things back. And I said back China sends things back and I said before they tax us, but they send it back before they tax us, but they send it back before they tax us.
But they send it back. They'd rather send it back to Texas, but they'd rather send it back to Texas, but they'd rather send it back to Texas. But if we haven't get it in what they did, if we haven't get it in what they did, if we haven't get it in what they did, look, what they did with Boeing build a look what they did with Boeing build a look what they did with Boeing build a plant, we get all of your, your plant, we get all of your, your plant, we get all of your - your information, we get everything, you've information, we get everything you've information we get everything you've ever worked for, for so many years for ever worked.
For - for so many years for ever worked for, for so many years for building airplanes, we gonna take this building airplanes, we gonna take this building airplanes, we gonna take this, we're going to take that and South, we're going to take that. And South, we're going to take that and South Carolina, which is an amazing state that Carolina, which is an amazing state, that Carolina, which is an amazing state that I love so much and you look at the - I love so much and you look at the - I Love so much and you look at the entire Washington State area where they entire Washington State area where they entire Washington State area where they make so many Boeing's be careful because make so many Boeing's be careful because make so many Boeing's be careful because they're building Massive Boeing plants, they're building massive Boeing plants, they're building massive Boeing plants in China, massive and though and in - in China, massive and though and in - in China massive.
And though - and in addition to that, China is building their addition to that. China is building their addition to that. China is building their own plants, which is probably even a own plants, which is probably even a own plants, which is probably even a bigger problem. But they force Boeing to bigger problem, but they force Boeing to bigger problem.
But they force Boeing to build these massive plants and then all build these massive plants and then all build these massive plants. And then all of a sudden they'll do a devaluation and of a sudden they'll do a devaluation and of a sudden they'll do a devaluation. And another devaluation and Boeing will make another devaluation and Boeing will make another devaluation.
And Boeing will make 100 % of the airplanes not from South 100 % of the airplanes, not from South 100 % of the airplanes, not from South Carolina where they just moved. And built Carolina where they just moved and built Carolina where they just moved and built some incredible facilities, not from some incredible facilities, not from some incredible facilities, not from Washington State.
In the Seattle area, Washington State in the Seattle area, Washington State, in the Seattle area, they're going to build from China and they're going to build from China and they're going to build from China and they're going to do that by devaluing. They're going to do that by devaluing. They're going to do that by devaluing their currency.
And I tell the people of their currency and I tell the people of their currency and I tell the people of South Carolina actually, which was great. South Carolina actually, which was great, South Carolina actually, which was great to me, which was a big win for me, I said to me, which was a big win for me.
I said to me, which was a big win for me. I said be careful because that's what's be careful because that's what's be careful because that's what's happening as sure as you're sitting happening as sure as you're sitting happening as sure as you're sitting there. And in five years, you'll say you there.
And in five years, you'll say you there and in five years you'll say, you know that Trump was right. Okay. Yes, sir, know that Trump was right. Okay. Yes, sir, know that Trump was right. Okay. Yes, sir, good 22 people. We had some of the finest good 22 people. We had some of the finest good 22 people. We had some of the finest tool and die makers in the country.
We tool and die makers in the country. We tool and die makers in the country. We had the latest technology, we spent a had the latest technology, we spent a had the latest technology, we spent a million dollars in equipment. It is million dollars in equipment. It is million dollars in equipment. It is myself my father.
It was my great uncle myself. My father, it was my great uncle myself, my father. It was my great uncle. We lost all of that to China and you - we lost all of that to China and you - we lost all of that to China and you know we were making police badges sacred know we were making police badges sacred know we were making police badges sacred.
They're all being made in China. They're all being made in China. They're all being made in China. All you have to do is type in all you have to do is type in all you have to do is type in police badges, California, China and it's police badges, California, China and it's police badges, California, China.
And it's all there. I lost all that business. A all there, I lost all that business, a all there I lost all that business, a million dollars, million dollars, million dollars. I call my Congress people off, hey, I call my Congress people off, hey, I call my Congress people off, hey, there's something unfair here.
They're - there's something unfair here. They're - there's something unfair here. They're making this item 2/3 less than me making this item, 2/3 less than me making this item. 2/3 less than me. I said that's material costs. I went to - I said that's material costs. I went to - I said that's material costs.
I went to them. I've got nothing from them at all. I them. I've got nothing from them at all. I them. I've got nothing from them at all. I so will have to retrain the workers for. So will have to retrain the workers for so will have to retrain the workers for what we had full blue cross. We had paid what we had full blue cross.
We had paid what we had full blue cross. We had paid vacations, we had 401ks, I used to be able vacations. We had 401ks, I used to be able vacations. We had 401ks. I used to be able to take a two-week vacation that's gone to take a two-week vacation that's gone to take a two-week vacation that's gone. What are you gonna do for us, okay.
So I - what are you gonna do for us? Okay. So I - what are you gonna do for us? Okay. So I think - I think first of all, your story is think - I think first of all, your story is think - I think first of all, your story is common to thousands and thousands of common to thousands. And thousands of common to thousands and thousands of companies throughout this country and in companies throughout this country and in companies throughout this country.
And in the end, what we're going to do very the end, what we're going to do very the end, what we're going to do very easily is we're going to make it. So when easily is we're going to make it. So when easily is we're going to make it. So when somebody country, when they currency, somebody country when they currency, somebody country when they currency manipulate, when they devalue their manipulate, when they devalue their manipulate, when they devalue their currency, which as you know makes it currency, which as you know makes it currency, which as You know, makes it impossible to compete.
It's costing us a impossible to compete. It's costing us a impossible to compete. It's costing us a fortune folks. You know, it sounds good fortune folks, you know, it sounds good. Fortune folks, you know, it sounds good, but of course because we lose all those, but of course because we lose all those.
But of course because we lose all those jobs and you're better off paying 10 % jobs and you're better off paying 10 % jobs. And you're better off paying 10 % more, 15 % more for the badges or whatever, more, 15 % more for the badges or whatever, more, 15 % more for the badges or whatever they may be. And all of these people are - they may be - and all of these people are - they may be - and all of these people are still working.
It's cheaper for our still working. It's cheaper for our still working. It's cheaper for our country. We make it's very profitable for country. We make - it's very profitable for country. We make - it's very profitable for our country now. We don't play the game our country now. We don't play the game our country now.
We don't play the game the way they play the game. They play the - the way they play the game, they play the - the way they play the game, they play the game to win. We play the game in this game to win. We play the game in this game to win. We play the game in this country to survive. We're gonna start country to survive.
We're gonna start country to survive. We're gonna start playing the game to win, so just hang in playing the game to win. So just hang in playing the game to win. So just hang in there. I know it's not easy but hang in there. I know it's not easy but hang in there. I know it's not easy, but hang in there, man, hang in so sad and what you there man, hang in.
So sad and what you there man, hang in so sad and what you just said, thousands and thousands of just said thousands and thousands of just said thousands and thousands of companies in our country. Thank you. All right. So when you talk about - all right, so when you talk about all right. So when you talk about countering this kind of globalism effort, countering this kind of globalism effort, countering this kind of globalism effort with bringing more profits back to the - with bringing more profits back to the - with bringing more profits back to the United States.
Although that seems very United States, although that seems very United States, although that seems very good for small business in the middle, good for small business in the middle, good for small business in the middle class. How do you plan on dealing with a class? How do you plan on dealing with a class?
How do you plan on dealing with a corporate backlash for larger companies, corporate backlash for larger companies, corporate backlash for larger companies who can make a much larger profit when who can make a much larger profit? When who can make a much larger profit when they are ex, when they're - you don't have - they are ex, when they're - you don't have - they are ex when they're - you don't have a lot of backlashes.
And you know, you're a lot of backlashes and you know you're a lot of backlashes and you know, you're gonna have a backlash where maybe people gonna have a backlash where maybe people gonna have a backlash where maybe people are gonna move from. New Hampshire, but are gonna move from New Hampshire but are gonna move from New Hampshire, but they're not gonna move out to Mexico and they're not gonna move out to Mexico and they're not gonna move out to Mexico and they're not gon Na move out that they can - they're not gonna move out that they can.
They're not gonna move out that they can move to another state like with carrier move to another state like with carrier move to another state like with carrier carrier might move to another state carrier might move to another state carrier might move to another state. Plenty to choose from and this way you plenty to choose from and this way you plenty to choose from and this way you can really do your own thing can really do your own thing, can really do your own thing.
Corporations, I'm not worried about it corporations. I'm not worried about it. Corporations, I'm not worried about it. Don't forget my tax plan is cutting. Don't forget my tax plan is cutting. Don't forget my tax plan is cutting business taxes way down and cutting business taxes way down and cutting business taxes way down and cutting taxes for middle income and everybody taxes for middle income and everybody taxes for middle income and everybody way down.
And we're going to have a over way down and we're going to have a over way down and we're going to have a - over the next 2-3 weeks, we're going to have a - the next 2-3 weeks. We're going to have a - the next 2-3 weeks, we're going to have a very, very highly sophisticated tax plan, very, very highly sophisticated tax plan, very, very highly sophisticated tax plan done with some of the best people, the done with some of the best people.
The done with some of the best people, the best economists, the best minds in the best economists, the best minds in the best economists, the best minds in the world for it. We're going to really have world for it. We're going to really have world for it. We're going to really have some plan coming up.
We put the rudiments some plan coming up. We put the rudiments some plan coming up. We put the rudiments in and the real rudiment is we're going in and the real rudiment is we're going in and the real rudiment is we're going to simplify our tax code number one and to simplify our tax code, number one. And to simplify our tax code, number one, and we're going to cut the hell out of taxes.
We're going to cut the hell out of taxes. We're going to cut the hell out of taxes with a highest taxed or just about the - with a highest taxed or just about the - with a highest taxed or just about the highest tax nation in the world and our highest tax nation in the world. And our highest tax nation in the world and our businesses can't compete with other businesses, can't compete with other businesses, can't compete with other businesses for that reason also.
So we're businesses for that reason also. So we're businesses for that reason also. So we're going to make it where the corporation's going to make it, where the corporation's going to make it where the corporation's want to come back. And part of the reason want to come back and part of the reason want to come back.
And part of the reason and part of the problem that and part of the problem that and part of the problem that corporations have in all fairness is corporations have in all fairness is corporations have in all fairness is they have to pay so much tax. We have - I - they have to pay so much tax we have, I - they have to pay so much tax.
We have I think five trillion, but they say two and think five trillion, but they say two and think five trillion, but they say two and a half trillion. And I think it's a much a half trillion and I think it's a much a half trillion. And I think it's a much higher number than that outside of this higher number than that.
Outside of this higher number than that, outside of this country where corporations have this country where corporations have this country where corporations have this money, they can't get it in because the money, they can't get it in because the money they can't get it in. Because the taxes are so high and because the taxes are so high and because the taxes are so high and because the bureaucracy is just as bad as the taxes, bureaucracy is just as bad as the taxes bureaucracy is just as bad as the taxes.
So companies - corporate inversions, so companies, corporate inversions, so companies, corporate inversions, companies are actually leaving. The companies are actually leaving. The companies are actually leaving the United States and going to other United States and going to other United States and going to other countries to pick up their money because countries to pick up their money because countries to pick up their money because they can't get their Money in and that they can't get their money in and that they can't get their money in and that money could be used to rebuild the money could be used to rebuild the money, could be used to rebuild the United States.
You're talking about United States, you're talking about United States, you're talking about trillions of dollars. So all of these trillions of dollars, so all of these trillions of dollars. So all of these things are covered by me and I have to - things are covered by me and I have to - things are covered by me and I have to say the Democrats and the Republicans say the Democrats and the Republicans say the Democrats and the Republicans For years, all agree on this, what's for years, all agree on this, what's for years, all agree on this.
What's - what's not to agree with, we're going to - what's not to agree with, we're going to - what's not to agree with, we're going to bring our money into the United States, bring our money into the United States, bring our money into the United States. Trillions of doll - trillions of doll, trillions of doll we bring it into the United States, right?
We bring it into the United States, right? We bring it into the United States, right? I don't really need those notes because I don't really need those notes because I don't really need those notes because I don't need notes. I don't need notes. I don't need notes. We're not lucky that I don't need Arnel.
We're not lucky that I don't need Arnel. We're not lucky that I don't need Arnel. I can draw my way wrong. I can draw my way wrong. I can draw my way wrong. Nice, nice to have that ability. Isn't it nice, nice to have that ability, isn't it nice, nice to have that ability. Isn't it - it's a good ability to have anyway, it's a good ability to have anyway.
It's a good ability to have anyway, but we will do things that are going to, but we will do things that are going to - but we will do things that are going to be so miraculous and it'll be fast. It be so miraculous and it'll be fast. It be so miraculous and it'll be fast, it won't take a long period of time and you won't take a long period of time and you won't take a long period of time.
And you know when China who I have a great know when China who I have a great know when China, who I have a great relationship with China, made a lot of relationship with China, made a lot of relationship with China, made a lot of money with China, you can make money with money with China, you can make money with money with China, you can make money with China.
It's hard to believe as a citizen China, it's hard to believe as a citizen China, it's hard to believe as a citizen looking at what they've done to us, but looking at what they've done to us, but looking at what they've done to us. But we can make a lot of money with China. We can make a lot of money with China.
We can make a lot of money with China. I love having open Marx's returnin and I love having open Marx's returnin and I love having open Marx's returnin. And when they know that they're going to be when they know that they're going to be - when they know that they're going to be consequences for their cheating, they're consequences for their cheating.
They're consequences for their cheating. They're not going to do what they are doing, not going to do what they are doing, not going to do what they are doing. I'll give you an example. They're - I'll give you an example. They're - I'll give you an example. They're building right now. One of the largest building right now, one of the largest building right now, one of the largest military fortresses in the world in the military fortresses in the world, in the military fortresses in the world, in the South China Sea.
Now they're taking our South China Sea. Now they're taking our South China Sea now they're taking our money. They're taking our jobs, they're money, they're taking our jobs, they're money, they're taking our jobs, they're taking our pride or pride and they're taking our pride or pride and they're taking our pride or pride and they're violating everything there is to violate, violating everything there is to Violate violating everything there is to violate by building this massive fortress in the - by building this massive fortress in the - by building this massive fortress in the South China Sea.
And unlike us, they don't South China Sea and unlike us they don't South China Sea. And unlike us, they don't get environmental impact permanence by. Get environmental impact permanence by get environmental impact permanence, by the way they say, build it, they saw it the way they say, build it. They saw it the way they say, build it.
They saw it work. The following hour. We say, build work the following hour. We say build work the following hour, we say build something, they start work 12 years from something they start work 12 years from something they start work 12 years from now or does it ever happen okay now or does it ever happen okay now or does it Ever happen, okay.
Can you imagine that they're building an - can you imagine that they're building an - can you imagine that they're building an island? They took - they have the biggest island they took. They have the biggest island they took. They have the biggest excavators in the world sitting out in excavators in the world, sitting out in excavators in the world, sitting out in the sea, ripping the hell out of the the sea, ripping the hell out of the the sea, ripping the hell out of the Ocean out of the sea, ripping the hell ocean out of the sea, ripping the hell ocean out of the sea, ripping the hell out of it.
And they don't say like, oh, gee out of it. And they don't say like, oh, gee out of it. And they don't say like, oh, gee, we have to file for an environmental, we have to file for an environmental, we have to file for an environmental impact permit. They just do what they do impact permit. They just do what they do impact permit.
They just do. What they do that's because they don't respect us, that's because they don't respect us, that's because they don't respect us. That's why they do it. They have no, that's why they do it. They have no - that's why they do it. They have no respect for a leader. They have no respect for a leader.
They have no respect for a leader. They have no respect for our country, a very, very respect for our country, a very, very respect for our country, a very, very important man than the world of politics, important man than the world of politics, important man than the world of politics and well beyond politics Said to me and well beyond politics said to me and well beyond politics said to me, Donald, I totally disagreed with your Donald.
I totally disagreed with your Donald. I totally disagreed with your talk. You know because I've had this talk, you know, because I've had this talk, you know, because I've had this tough stance for a while long time, tough stance for a while long time, tough stance for a while long time, pretty a long time.
If you go back, it's pretty a long time. If you go back, it's pretty a long time. If you go back, it's actually years many years. But he said I actually years many years, but he said I actually years many years. But he said, I really disagreed your tough talk on really disagreed, your tough talk on really disagreed, your tough talk on and Saudi Arabia and all these countries and Saudi Arabia and all these countries and Saudi Arabia and all these countries paying us, paying us paying us.
And I paying us paying us - paying us and I paying us paying us paying us. And I totally disagreed except for one thing totally disagreed except for one thing totally disagreed except for one thing I've been called by. All of these, I've been called by all of these, I've been called by all of these countries, how do we settle up with Trump countries, how do we settle up with Trump countries, how do we settle up with Trump?
How do we make Trump like this? How do we - how do we make Trump like this? How do we - how do we make Trump like this? How do we do it? How do we do it now? I'm not saying do it - how do we do it now? I'm not saying do it - how do we do it now, I'm not saying that in a braggadocious what I'm just that in a braggadocious what I'm just that in a braggadocious what I'm just saying that's the way life is saying that's the way life is saying.
That's the way life is. There are no repercussions right now at - there are no repercussions right now at - there are no repercussions right now at all for what all of these countries are all for what all of these countries are all for what all of these countries are doing to our countries. To our jobs, to doing to our countries, to our jobs, to doing to our countries, to our jobs, to our workers, none the story that you just - our workers, none the story that you just - our workers, none the story that you just told.
I mean there are none and your told, I mean there are none and your told, I mean there are none and your congressmen are all all these caught congressmen are all all these caught congressmen are all all these caught people in the Senate, people in Congress, people In the Senate, people in Congress, people in the Senate, people in Congress, a congressman, I know everyone and some a congressman.
I know everyone and some a congressman. I know everyone and some are really fine people and some aren't, are really fine. People and some aren't - are really fine people and some aren't and some senators are really fine. People and some senators are really fine. People and some senators are really fine people and some aren't, but many of them are and some aren't.
But many of them are and some aren't, but many of them are totally owned by and taken care of by totally owned, by and taken care of, by totally owned, by and taken care of, by lobbyists and special interests because lobbyists and special interests, because lobbyists and Special interests because a friend of mine said how could the a friend of mine said, how could the a friend of mine said, how could the United States allow ideal like so-and-so United States allow ideal like so-and-so United States allow ideal like so-and-so to happen.
And I said because the special to happen and I said because the special to happen and I said because the special interests take care of him, my friend interests, take care of him, my friend interests, take care of him, my friend who's very smart and very successful. But who's very smart and very successful, but who's very smart and very successful, but very naive, couldn't believe that anybody very naive, couldn't believe that anybody very naive, couldn't believe that anybody.
So he said they're stupid. I said no. So he said they're stupid. I said no. So he said they're stupid. I said no, they're not stupid. They're totally - they're not stupid. They're totally - they're not stupid. They're totally controlled by their lobbyists and controlled by their lobbyists and controlled by their lobbyists.
And they're totally controlled by the - they're totally controlled by the - they're totally controlled by the special interests and when it's campaign, special interests and when it's campaign, special interests and when it's campaign season millions and millions of dollars, season millions and millions of dollars season millions and Millions of dollars are given to some of these people and are given to some of these people and are given to some of these people and it's so simple, do I know the system well, it's so simple, do I know the system well, it's so simple.
Do I know the system well, ok, how about one more question? That's it. Ok. How about one more question? That's it. Ok. How about one more question? That's it. Go ahead you want to talk? Hello, that's go ahead. You want to talk? Hello, that's go ahead. You want to talk hello, that's right, get that mic right, get that mic right, get that mic, get that mic over there.
Mike, can I hold - get that mic over there? Mike, can I hold - get that mic over there? Mike? Can I hold it? Yeah, let him hold it. Let him hold it. See there's a man. There's the man that see there's a man. There's the man that see there's a man. There's the man that knows what he wants. That's my kind of knows what he wants.
That's my kind of knows what he wants. That's my kind of guy. Guy, guy go ahead. Well this you this might shock go ahead. Well this you this might shock go ahead. Well this you this might shock you, but we have something in common good you. But we have something in common good you, but we have something in common.
Good respect for human life. Thank you. Okay. No respect for human life. Thank you. Okay. No respect for human life. Thank you. Okay. No, I have two comments on my deep respect. I have two comments on my deep respect. I have two comments on my deep respect for human life, okay, number one and you for human life, okay, number one and you for human life, okay, number one and you can comment on my objections number one can comment on my objections.
Number one can comment on my objections, number one and number two, okay. Number one, I'm and number two, okay. Number one, I'm and number two, okay. Number one, I'm opposed to the murder of unborn babies opposed to the murder of unborn babies opposed to the murder of unborn babies being legal, number two being legal, number two being legal.
Number two, I'm opposed to are wasting military in, I'm opposed to are wasting military in. I'm opposed to are wasting military in the Middle East on behalf of Zionist, the Middle East on behalf of Zionist, the Middle East on behalf of Zionist Israel. Thank you. All right. Well, let me - Israel, thank you.
All right. Well, let me - Israel, thank you. All right. Well, let me just tell you that Israel is a very, very - just tell you that Israel is a very, very - just tell you that Israel is a very, very important ally of the United States and important ally of the United States and important ally of the United States and we are going to protect them 100 %, 100 %. We are going to protect them 100 %, 100 %. We are going to protect them 100 %, 100 %. They've been our most reliable.
It's our - they've been our most reliable. It's our - they've been our most reliable, it's our true friend over there and we are going true friend over there and we are going true friend over there and we are going to protect Israel 100 % as to number one to protect Israel 100 % as to Number one, to protect Israel 100 % as to number one, we all were with you, okay?
We all were with you, okay? We all were with you. Okay, one more we got to ask one more because one more we got to ask one more because one more we got to ask one more because that was a tough question on Israel. That was a tough question on Israel. That was a tough question on Israel, right? That was nasty, right?
That was nasty, right? That was nasty, whoa. Are we all for Israel, right, man? Whoa? Are we all for Israel, right? Man? Whoa? Are we all for Israel? Right, man? Okay, go ahead. Let's go thank you very. Okay, go ahead. Let's go - thank you very. Okay, go ahead. Let's go - thank you very much. Okay, we're for America too.
I agree much. Okay, we're for America too. I agree much. Okay, we're for America too. I agree. I would say that most of us here read, I would say that most of us here read. I would say that most of us here read out of the same economic PlayBook as you out of the same economic PlayBook as you out of the same economic PlayBook.
As you right, most of us are probably right. Most of us are probably right. Most of us are probably self-employed, so we agree wholeheartedly, self-employed. So we agree wholeheartedly, self-employed. So we agree wholeheartedly. What I would like in front of these, what I would like in front of these, what I would like in front of these cameras once and for all cameras once and for all cameras once and for all please put to bed that you will adhere.
Please put to bed that you will adhere please put to bed that you will adhere to and follow the United States to and follow the United States to and follow the United States Constitution is your compass for Constitution, is your compass for Constitution? Is your compass for governance, okay, by the way, hundred governance, okay, by the way, hundred governance, okay, by the way, hundred percent.
I love the question or the percent I love the question or the percent. I love the question or the statement in this case. But 100 percent statement in this case, but 100 percent statement in this case. But 100 percent. You know during the primaries where you know during the primaries where you know during the primaries where meet everybody very easily that was meet everybody very easily.
That was meet everybody. Very easily that was sometimes said, will he follow the, sometimes said, will he follow the, sometimes said, will he follow the Constitution folks? One of the great Constitution folks, one of the great Constitution folks, one of the great, great instruments ever written ever great instruments ever written, ever great instruments ever written, ever conceived, conceived, conceived, we're with the Constitution 100 %, okay.
So we're with the Constitution 100 %, okay. So we're with the Constitution 100 %, okay. So - and you think Hillary Clinton would ever and you think Hillary Clinton would ever and you think Hillary Clinton would ever do a news conference like this totally do a news conference like this totally do a news conference like this totally unvetted.
And by the way, speaking of unvetted and by the way, speaking of unvetted and by the way, speaking of unvetted, we're gonna take care of our unvetted, we're gonna take care of our unvetted, we're gonna take care of our vets. Just remember that ow my al al is I vets just remember that ow my al al is I vets just remember that ow my al al is - I met Alan, New Hampshire.
I always say he's met Alan, New Hampshire. I always say he's met Alan, New Hampshire. I always say he's one of the most loyal people I've ever, one of the most loyal people I've ever - one of the most loyal people I've ever known, known, known. He loves the vets. He fights for the vets. He loves the vets.
He fights for the vets. He loves the vets. He fights for the vets. He went to everybody's speeches during - he went to everybody's speeches during - he went to everybody's speeches during the New Hampshire, primary and even the New Hampshire primary and even the New Hampshire primary and even before and all of a sudden, I noticed he before and all of A sudden I noticed he before and all of a sudden I noticed he was at mine more and more and I said who was at mine more and more and I said who was at mine more and more.
And I said who is this guy and he's an unbelievable, is this guy and he's an unbelievable, is this guy and he's an unbelievable veteran, respected by the veterans, more veteran, respected by the veterans, more veteran, respected by the veterans more than anybody. I know we have the guys than anybody. I know we have the guys than anybody.
I know we have the guys with the fancy suits and the ties that with the fancy suits and the ties that with the fancy suits and the ties that get the big consulting money. This is the get the big consulting money. This is the get the big consulting money. This is the guy that's respected, more than anybody I guy that's respected more than anybody I guy that's respected more than anybody I know and stand-up and after after a know and stand-up and after after a know and stand-up and after after a couple of months of Listening to couple of months of listening to couple of months of listening to everybody else on both sides, Democrat, everybody else on both sides, Democrat, everybody else on both sides, Democrat and Republican.
He came to us, he said, and Republican, he came to us, he said, and Republican, he came to us. He said there's nobody that's going to take care. There's nobody that's going to take care. There's nobody that's going to take care of the vets like you. And I want to come of the vets like you and I want to come of the vets like you and I want to come on board and he is the most amazing guy on board.
And he is the most amazing guy on board and he is the most amazing guy. And I'll tell you what, he's one of the - and I'll tell you what he's one of the - and I'll tell you what he's - one of the great things that's happened to me, great things that's happened to me, great things. That's happened to me because we formulated plans and done because we formulated plans and done because we formulated plans and done things that he's taken back to large things that he's taken back to large things that he's taken back to large groups of veterans.
And we have plans, groups of veterans and we have plans, groups of veterans and we have plans that are better than any plans ever that are better than any plans ever that are better than any plans ever submitted. And it's going to work well submitted and it's going to work well submitted and it's going to work well for the vets work well for the country, for the vets work well for the country, for the vets work well for the country and we're going to be Proud that we take and we're going to be proud that we take and we're going to be proud that we take care of our veterans.
Are they gonna be care of our veterans? Are they gonna be care of our veterans? Are they gonna be proud of our country again? Oh, thank you, proud of our country again. Oh, thank you proud of our country again. Oh, thank you. Okay. Thank all the women are Zilly, right. Okay, thank all the women are Zilly, right.
Okay, thank all the women are Zilly right. The women like me, I don't know. I see by the women like me, I don't know. I see by the women like me, I don't know. I see by the way thank you. Yes, go ahead. I would the way - thank you. Yes, go ahead. I would the way - thank you. Yes, go ahead. I would like to tell you like to tell you, like to tell you, I want to thank you first of all for - I want to thank you first of all for - I want to thank you.
First of all, for everything you've done for the veterans, everything you've done for the veterans, everything you've done for the veterans, we all in the VFW know what you've done. We all in the VFW know what you've done. We all in the VFW know what you've done even if you don't come out and say it ok, even if you don't come out and say it ok, even if you don't come out and say it ok very much.
We appreciate it. But just to very much, we appreciate it, but just to very much we appreciate it, but just to mix quickly, homeland security and jobs mix, quickly, homeland security and jobs mix quickly, homeland security and jobs, why aren't we putting our retiree? Our - why aren't we putting our retiree, our - why aren't we putting our retiree, our military retirees on that border or in military retirees on that border or in military retirees on that border or in TSA, get rid of all these hid Hebe TSA, get rid of all These hid Hebe TSA get rid of all these hid, Hebe jobbies, they wear at TSA, in them myself, jobbies, they wear at TSA, in them myself, jobbies, they wear at TSA, in them myself.
We need the veterans back in there to - we need the veterans back in there to - we need the veterans back in there to take it. They fought for this country and take it. They fought for this country and take it. They fought for this country and defended it, they'll still do it. Ok, thank defended it. They'll still do it.
Ok, thank defended it. They'll still do it. Ok, thank you. You know and we are looking at that. You, you know, and we are looking at that. You you know and we are looking at that and we are looking at that, we're looking and we are looking at that, we're looking and we are looking at that. We're looking at a lot of things.
I have to tell you as at a lot of things. I have to tell you as at a lot of things, I have to tell you as long as you bring it up though in terms long as you bring it up though in terms long as you bring it up though in terms of the border, some great People and now of the border, some great people and now of the border some great people and now you know this, we were endorsed.
I was you know this, we were endorsed. I was - you know this we were endorsed, I was endorsed by 16,500 Border Patrol agents endorsed by 16,500 Border Patrol agents endorsed by 16,500 Border Patrol agents. These are the people that take care of. These are the people that take care of. These are the people that take care of the border and first time they've ever the border and first time they've ever the border.
And first time they've ever endorsed in the history of the Union or endorsed in the history of the Union or endorsed in the history of the Union or the group. It's the first time they've the group. It's the first time they've the group. It's the first time they've ever endorsed a presidential candidate ever endorsed a presidential candidate ever endorsed a presidential candidate.
And I don't even know if they're - and I don't even know if they're - and I don't even know if they're supposed to be doing it. And they said we supposed to be doing it and they said we supposed to be doing it and they said we don't even care at this point, don't even care at this point, don't even care at this point.
It's 16,500 incredible people out these - it's 16,500 incredible people out these - it's 16,500 incredible people out. These are incredible people that want to do are incredible people that want to do are incredible people that want to do their job. It's easier for them not to do their job. It's easier for them not to do their job.
It's easier for them not to do their job, but they want to do their job, their job, but they want to do their job, their job. But they want to do their job and so I was really honored by that. And and so I was really honored by that. And and so I was really honored by that. And I was also, as you know, endorsed by - I was also, as you know, endorsed by - I was also, as you know, endorsed by Sheriff Joe from Arizona, who who's had Sheriff Joe from Arizona, who who's had Sheriff Joe from Arizona who - who's had some great victories Lately, so Sheriff, some great victories lately, so Sheriff, some great victories lately.
So Sheriff, Joe is great. So we're gonna do a job, Joe, is great. So we're gonna do a job, Joe, is great. So we're gonna do a job just in finishing just before I came up just in finishing, just before I came up just in finishing, just before I came up, I was told I was told I was told rasmussen one of the most highly rasmussen, one of The most highly rasmussen, one of the most highly respected polls just came out, we're four respected polls just came out, we're four respected polls just came out.
We're four points ahead. So that's okay. We're four points ahead. So that's okay. We're four points ahead. So that's okay. We're four points ahead, so we're gonna have points ahead. So we're gonna have points ahead. So we're gonna have something, I think that's going to be something I think that's going to be something I think that's going to be very exciting.